Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 8. Dissolution.

§ 50-73.49.
Dissolution generally.

A limited partnership formed under this chapter or that has filed an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership in compliance with subsection D of §

50-73.77

is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following events:

At the time or upon the occurrence of any events specified in the certificate of limited partnership or in writing in the partnership agreement;

Upon the unanimous written consent of the partners;

Upon an event of withdrawal of a general partner unless:

At the time there is at least one other general partner, in which event, unless otherwise provided in the written provisions of the partnership agreement or agreed upon by all remaining partners, the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of the event of withdrawal; or

Within 90 days after the withdrawal, all remaining partners agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired, in which event the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of the event of withdrawal;

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under §

50-73.50

;

Automatic cancellation of its existence pursuant to §

50-73.52:5

; or

Involuntary cancellation of its existence pursuant to §

50-73.52:6

.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1996, c. 255; 2007, c. 631; 2008, cc. 586, 588, 770; 2009, c. 167; 2015, c. 614.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “formed under this chapter or that has filed an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership in compliance with subsection D of §

50-73.77

” near the beginning and “events” at the end; rewrote subdivision 1, which read: “At the time specified in the certificate of limited partnership”; deleted subdivision 1a, which read: “Occurrence of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;”; in subdivision 2, substituted “Upon the unanimous written” for “Written” at the beginning and “the partners” for “all partners” at the end; and in subdivision 3, inserted “Upon” at the beginning and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, deleted “or” at the end of subdivision A 4; in subdivision A 5, substituted “cancellation of its existence pursuant to §

50-73.52:5

; or”
for “cancellation of the certificate of limited partnership pursuant to §

50-73.69

”; and added subdivision A 6.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and designated the exisiting provisions of this section as subsection A and added subsections B through D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, deleted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; and deleted subsections B through D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 614 rewrote subdivision 3, which read “Upon an event of withdrawal of a general partner unless at the time there is at least one other general partner and the written provisions of the partnership agreement permit the business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general partner and that partner does so, but the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of any event of withdrawal, if, within 90 days after the withdrawal, all partners agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired.”

Law Review.

For note, “The Revised Uniform Partnership Act Breakup Provisions: Stability or Headache?”, see 50 Wash. & Lee. L. Rev. 905 (1993).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 100.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Withdrawal of general partner. —

By assigning her entire partnership interest to her revocable trust, a mother withdrew from a limited partnership, and the limited partnership had no general partner since when the mother assigned her general partnership interest, it automatically converted to a limited partnership interest under a conversion provision, and triggered dissolution under §

50-73.45

as: (1) a transfer of all of a general partner’s interest was an event of withdrawal under §

50-73.28

; (2) under §

50-73.49

, the withdrawal of the sole remaining general partner triggered dissolution unless all the remaining partners agreed to continue the limited partnership; (3) the children did not so agree; and (4) at least one general partner was required to maintain a limited partnership under §

50-73.11

.Smith v. Smith, 81 Va. Cir. 135, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 114 (Fairfax County Aug. 25, 2010).

§ 50-73.50.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner, the circuit court of the locality in which the registered office is located may decree dissolution of a limited partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

When the winding up of the affairs of the limited partnership has been completed, the court shall so advise the Commission, which shall enter an order of cancellation of the limited partnership’s existence.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 2008, c. 586.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions of this section as subsection A and added subsection B; substituted “circuit court of the locality in which the registered office is located may” for “circuit court as specified in §

50-73.16

may” in subsection A.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Subject matter jurisdiction. —

Section

50-73.50

did limit the general grant of civil jurisdiction in cases seeking the judicial dissolution of a limited partnership. Defendants motion to dismiss plaintiff’s petition for dissolution of a limited partnership was granted for lack of subject matter jurisdiction because the partnership was formed and registered under the laws of Georgia, and the partnership was a creature of the state by which it was chartered. Valone v. Valone, 80 Va. Cir. 45, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 16 (Norfolk Jan. 20, 2010).

§ 50-73.51.
Winding up.

The winding up of a limited partnership shall be completed when all debts, liabilities, and obligations of the limited partnership have been paid and discharged or reasonably adequate provision therefor has been made, and all of the remaining property and assets of the limited partnership have been distributed to the partners.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, or a person or persons approved by the limited partners, or if there is more than one class of limited partners, then as approved by each such class, by the affirmative vote of limited partners holding more than 50 percent of the then current interests in the profits of the limited partnership owned by all limited partners or by the limited partners in each class, as appropriate, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs; however, the circuit court of the locality in which the registered office is located, on cause shown, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs on application of any partner, his legal representative, or assignee, and in connection therewith, may appoint one or more liquidating trustees.

Upon dissolution of a limited partnership and until the effective date of a certificate of cancellation filed pursuant to §

50-73.52:4

, the liquidating trustees, in the name and on behalf of the limited partnership, may (i) prosecute and defend suits, whether civil, criminal or administrative, (ii) wind up the limited partnership’s business, (iii) dispose of and convey the limited partnership’s property, (iv) discharge or make reasonable provision for the limited partnership’s liabilities, and (v) distribute to the partners any remaining assets of the limited partnership, all without affecting the liability of limited partners and without imposing the liability of a general partner on a liquidating trustee.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 1997, c. 188; 2008, c. 586.

The 1997 amendment

inserted “or by the limited partners in each class, as appropriate” near the middle of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, designated former subsections A and B as present subsections B and C, respectively and inserted subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “50 percent” for “fifty percent” and substituted “however, the circuit court of the locality in which the registered office is located, on cause” for “but the circuit court as specified in §

50-73.16

upon cause”; and substituted “the effective date of a certificate of cancellation filed pursuant to §

50-73.52:4

” for “the filing of a certificate of cancellation as provided in §

50-73.13

” in subsection C.

§ 50-73.52.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under §

50-73.36

or §

50-73.39

;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under §

50-73.36

or §

50-73.39

; and

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Editor’s note.

Section

50-73.39

, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1997, c. 188.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Section does not apply to assets of the general partner. —

Limited partners’ demurrer was overruled with regard to the liability of the general partner for litigation expenses, because §

50-73.52

only dealt with the assets of the partnership and not with assets of the general partner. Csontos v. MacDonnell, 58 Va. Cir. 22, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 387 (Fauquier County Aug. 1, 2001).

§ 50-73.52:1.
Known claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved limited partnership shall deliver to each of its known claimants written notice of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice shall:

Provide a reasonable description of the claim that the claimant may be entitled to assert;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted (i) the amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date, and (ii) any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State a deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which confirmation of the claim shall be delivered to the dissolved limited partnership; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written confirmation of the claim is not delivered by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved limited partnership is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection B and the claimant does not deliver written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved limited partnership by the deadline; or

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant that its claim is not admitted, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the delivery of written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved limited partnership.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include (i) a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or (ii) a liability or claim the ultimate maturity of which is more than 60 days after the delivery of written notice to the claimant pursuant to subsection B.

If a liability exists but the full extent of any damages is or may not be ascertainable, and a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced pursuant to subdivision C 2, the claimant may amend the pleadings after filing to include any damages that occurred or are alleged to have occurred after filing, and the court having jurisdiction of such claim may continue such proceeding during its pendency if it appears that further damages are or still may be occurring.

History.

2004, c. 601.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.52:2.
Other claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved limited partnership present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the dissolved limited partnership’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the dissolved limited partnership will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the date of publication of the notice.

If the dissolved limited partnership publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection B, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited partnership prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who was not given written notice under §

50-73.52:1

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved limited partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim does not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of §

50-73.52:1

.

A claim that is not barred by subsection C of §

50-73.52:1

or subsection C of §

50-73.52:2

may be enforced:

Against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

Except as provided in subsection D of §

50-73.52:3

, if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a partner of the dissolved limited partnership to the extent of the partner’s pro rata share of the claim or the limited partnership assets distributed to the partner in liquidation, whichever is less, but a partner’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the partner.

History.

2006, c. 912.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.52:3.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved limited partnership that has published a notice under §

50-73.52:2

may file an application with the circuit court of the city or county where the dissolved limited partnership’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved limited partnership or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved limited partnership, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under subsection C of §

50-73.52:2

.

Within 10 days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved limited partnership to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved limited partnership.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of such guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved limited partnership.

Provision by the dissolved limited partnership for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection A shall satisfy the dissolved limited partnership’s obligations with respect to claims that do not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of §

50-73.52:1

, and such claims may not be enforced against a partner who received assets in liquidation.

History.

2006, c. 912.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.52:4.
Certificate of cancellation.

When the affairs of a limited partnership have been wound up pursuant to §

50-73.51

, it shall file a certificate of cancellation with the Commission. The certificate shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The effective date of its certificate of limited partnership;

The reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

A statement that the limited partnership has completed the winding up of its affairs; and

Any other information the partners determine to include therein.

If the Commission finds that the certificate of cancellation complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall file the certificate of cancellation, canceling the limited partnership’s existence. Upon the effective date of such certificate, the existence of the limited partnership shall cease, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings, and appropriate actions by general partners and limited partners as provided in this chapter.

History.

2008, c. 586.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.52:5.
Automatic cancellation of limited partnership existence.

Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

50-73.69

is mailed, if any limited partnership fails to pay its annual registration fee on or before December 31 of the year assessed, its existence shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

If any limited partnership whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a statement of resignation pursuant to §

50-73.6

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

50-73.5

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the limited partnership of impending cancellation of its existence. If the limited partnership fails to file the statement of change on or before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending cancellation notice was mailed, the existence of the limited partnership shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

The properties and affairs of a limited partnership whose existence has been canceled pursuant to this section shall pass automatically to its general partners as trustees in liquidation. The trustees shall then proceed to (i) collect the assets of the limited partnership; (ii) sell, convey, and dispose of such of its properties as are not to be distributed in kind to its partners; (iii) pay, satisfy, and discharge its liabilities and obligations; and (iv) do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs. After paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, the trustees shall distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among its partners according to their respective rights and interests.

No partner or other agent of a limited partnership shall have any personal obligation for any liabilities of the limited partnership, whether such liabilities arise in contract, tort, or otherwise, solely by reason of the cancellation of the limited partnership’s existence pursuant to this section.

History.

2008, c. 586; 2013, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

50-73.69

is mailed,” at the beginning of subsection A.

§ 50-73.52:6.
Involuntary cancellation of limited partnership existence.

The existence of a limited partnership may be canceled involuntarily by order of the Commission when it finds that the limited partnership has:

Continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred on it by law;

Failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law;

Failed to file any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Commission; or

Been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its partners constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth.

Before entering any such order, the Commission shall issue a rule against the limited partnership giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

The properties and affairs of a limited partnership whose existence has been canceled pursuant to this section shall pass automatically to its general partners as trustees in liquidation. The trustees shall then proceed to (i) collect the assets of the limited partnership; (ii) sell, convey, and dispose of such of its properties as are not to be distributed in kind to its partners; (iii) pay, satisfy, and discharge its liabilities and obligations; and (iv) do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs. After paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, the trustees shall distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among its partners according to their respective rights and interests.

Any limited partnership convicted of the offense listed in subdivision A 4 shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction. A limited partnership whose existence is canceled pursuant to subdivision A 4 shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

History.

2008, c. 586; 2009, c. 167.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, added subdivision A 4 and made related changes; and added subsection D.

§ 50-73.52:7.
Reinstatement of a limited partnership that has ceased to exist.

A limited partnership that has ceased to exist may apply to the Commission for reinstatement within five years thereafter, unless the cancellation was by order of the Commission (i) entered pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

50-73.52:6

or (ii) entered pursuant to §

50-73.50

and the circuit court’s decree directing dissolution contains no provision for reinstatement of the existence of the limited partnership.

To have the certificate of limited partnership reinstated, a limited partnership shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement signed by a general partner of the limited partnership or, if there are no general partners, a limited partner, which may be in the form of a letter;

A reinstatement fee of $100;

All annual registration fees required by §

50-73.67

and penalties that were due before the certificate of limited partnership was canceled and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership had not been canceled;

If the name of the limited partnership does not comply with the provisions of §

50-73.2

at the time of reinstatement, an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership to change the limited partnership’s name to a name that satisfies the provisions of §

50-73.2

, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership; and

If the limited partnership’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

50-73.5

.

If the limited partnership complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement of existence. Upon entry of the order, the existence of the limited partnership shall be deemed to have continued from the date of the cancellation as if cancellation had never occurred, and any liability incurred by the limited partnership or a partner or other agent after the cancellation and before the reinstatement is determined as if cancellation of the limited partnership’s existence had never occurred.

History.

2008, c. 586.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”